District of Columbia statutes.
31-4730

Operative dates of §§ 31-4725 through 31-4730.

(a)

(1)

Except as described in § 31-4727, §§ 31-4725 through 31-4730 apply to policy forms filed 2 years after March 14, 1985.

(2)

No form shall be used in the District of Columbia 5 years after March 14, 1985, unless the form complies with § 31-4725 or unless the Commissioner approves the form under § 31-4726.

(3)

(A)

A form permitted to be used before 5 years after March 14, 1985, and complying with § 31-4725 need not be refiled to be approved under either § 31-4725 or § 31-4726.

(B)

The forms described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph may be used in the District of Columbia after the company files with the Commissioner a list of the forms used by the company and qualifying for the subparagraph (A) exception, the form number for each form, and, for each form, the certificate described in § 31-4725(d).

(b)

For individual forms and in the discretion of the Commissioner, the Commissioner may extend the deadlines described in subsection (a) of this section.

June 19, 1934, ch. 672, ch. V, § 30
as added Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-160, § 3(h), 32 DCR 39
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10, 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 23(f), 45 DCR 745
1981 Ed., § 35-536.
This section is referenced in § 31-4727.